en: organic dark chocolate
de: dunkle Bio-Schokolade
es: chocolate negro biológico
fi: luomu tumma suklaa
fr: chocolat noir bio
hr: organska tamna čokolada
it: cioccolato fondente biologico
nl: biologische pure chocola

en: dark chocolate with sweeteners
hr: tamna čokolada sa sladilima
it: cioccolato fondente con dolcificanti

en: chocolate bar
hr: kakao pločice
it: tavoletta di cioccolato

en: semi-sweet chocolate
fr: chocolat mi-sucré

en: milk chocolate, Milk chocolate bar
bg: млечен шоколад
ca: xocolata amb llet
cs: Mléčná čokoláda
da: mælkechokolade
de: Milchschokolade, Vollmilch-Schokolade
el: Σοκολάτα γάλακτος
eo: laktoĉokolado
es: chocolate con leche, chocolate con leche extrafino
eu: Esnedun txokolate
fi: maitosuklaa
fr: chocolat au lait, Chocolat au lait extra fin, Chocolat au lait en tablette
gl: Chocolate con leite
he: שוקולד חלב
hr: mliječna čokolada, mliječne čokolade
hu: tejcsokoládé
it: cioccolato al latte
ja: ミルクチョコレート
ko: 밀크 초콜릿
lv: piena šokolāde
nb: melkesjokolade
nl: Melkchocola, melkchocolade
nn: Mjølkesjokolade
pl: Czekolada mleczna, mleczna czekolada
pt: chocolate de leite, chocolate ao leite
ro: ciocolată cu lapte
ru: молочный шоколад
sv: mjölkchoklad
tr: Sütlü çikolata
uk: Молочний шоколад

en: belgian milk chocolate
de: belgische Milchschokolade
fr: chocolat au lait belge
hr: belgijska mliječna čokolada
it: cioccolato al latte belga
nl: Belgische melkchocolade

fr: pépites de chocolat au lait
da: stykker af mæelkechocolade
de: Milchschokoladenstückchen, Vollmilchschokoladenstückchen, Vollmilchschokoladentropfen
fi: maitosuklaarouhe, maitosuklaapaloja
it: pezzetti di cioccolato di latte
nl: stukjes melkchocolade
pl: kawalki czekolady mlecznej
pt: pepitas de chocolate de leite
sv: bitar av mjölkchoklad

de: Feine Milchschokolade, Vollmilchschokolade, Edel-Vollmilchschokolade
fr: chocolat supérieur au lait
it: Cioccolato superiore al latte

en: whole milk chocolate
hr: čokolada-od-punomasnog-mlijeka
it: cioccolato al latte intero

en: milk chocolate with sweetener
hr: mliječna čokolada sa sladilom
it: cioccolato al latte con dolcificante

en: white chocolate, White chocolate bar
ar: شوكولاتة بيضاء
be: Белы шакалад
bg: бял шоколад
bn: সাদা চকোলেট
ca: xocolata blanca
cs: bílá čokoláda
da: hvid chokolade
de: Weiße Schokolade, weisse Schokolade, weißes Schokoladen
eo: blanka ĉokolado
es: chocolate blanco
et: valge šokolaad
eu: Txokolate zuri
fa: شکلات سفید
fi: valkoinen suklaa, valkosuklaa
fr: chocolat blanc, Chocolat blanc en tablette, Tablette de chocolat blanc
gl: Chcolate branco
he: שוקולד לבן
hi: सफेद चॉकलेट
hr: bijela čokolada, bijele čokolade
hu: Fehér csokoládé
hy: Սպիտակ շոկոլադ
it: cioccolato bianco
ja: ホワイトチョコレート
ka: თეთრი შოკოლადი
ko: 화이트 초콜릿
lt: Baltas šokoladas, baltasis šokoladas
lv: baltā šokolāde
ms: Coklat putih
nb: hvit sjokolade
nl: witte chocolade
nn: kvit sjokolade
or: ଧଳା ଚୋକୋଲେଟ
pa: ਸਫ਼ੇਦ ਚਾਕਲੇਟ
pl: biała czekolada, czekolada biała
pt: chocolate branco
ro: ciocolată albă
ru: белый шоколад
sk: Biela čokoláda
sq: çokollatë e bardhë
sr: bela čokolada
sv: vit choklad
th: ไวต์ช็อกโกแลต
tr: Beyaz çikolata
tt: ак шоколад
uk: Білий шоколад
zh: 白朱古力

en: chocolate and white chocolate
hr: čokolade i bijele čokolade
it: cioccolato e cioccolato bianco

en: white chocolate powder
it: cioccolato bianco in polvere

en: chocolate sauce
de: Schokoladensoße
fi: suklaakastike
fr: sauce au chocolat, sauce parfum chocolat
hr: čokoladni umak
it: salsa al cioccolato
lt: šokoladinis padažas
nl: chocoladesaus
pl: sos czekoladowy
sv: chokladsås

de: Schokolierte Cornflakes
fr: cornflakes au chocolat
nl: cornflakes omhuld met chocolade

de: schokolierter Puffreis
fr: riz soufflé chocolaté
nl: met chocolade omhulde gepofte rijst

de: schokoliertes Reisextrudat
fr: extrudat de riz chocolaté
nl: chocolade rijstextrudaat

en: water, drinking water, tap water
ab: Аӡы
af: Water
am: ውሃ
an: Augua
ar: ماء
as: পানী
av: Лъим
ay: Uma
az: Su
ba: Һыу
be: Вада
bg: Вода, питейна вода, вода питейна
bh: पानी
bi: Wota
bm: Ji
bn: পানি
bo: ཆུ།
br: Dour
bs: Voda
ca: Aigua
ce: Хи
ch: Hånom
co: Acqua
cr: ᓃᐲᔾ
cs: Voda, pitná voda
cv: Шыв
cy: Dŵr
da: Vand
de: Wasser, Trinkwasser
dv: ފެން
el: Νερό
eo: Akvo
es: agua, agua potable
et: Vesi
eu: Ur
fa: آب
ff: Ndiyam
fi: vesi, vettä
fo: Vatn
fr: eau, eau potable, eau du robinet, eau osmosée
fy: Wetter
ga: Uisce
gd: Uisge
gl: Auga
gn: Y
gu: પાણી
gv: Ushtey
ha: Ruwa
he: מים
hi: जल
hr: voda, vode, vodu
ht: Dlo
hu: víz, ivóvíz, viz
hy: Ջուր
ia: Aqua
id: Air
ie: Aqua
ig: Mmiri
io: Aquo
is: Vatn
it: Acqua, acqua potabile
iu: ᐃᒪᖅ
ja: 水
jv: Banyu
ka: წყალი
kg: Maza
ki: Mai
kk: Су
km: ទឹក
kn: ನೀರು
ko: 물
ku: Av
ky: Суу
la: Aqua
lb: Waasser
lg: Amazzi
li: Water
ln: Mái
lt: Vanduo, geriamasis vanduo
lv: ūdens, dzeramais ūdens
mg: Rano
mi: Wai
mk: Вода
ml: ജലം
mn: Ус
mr: पाणी
ms: Air
my: ရေ
na: Ebok
nb: Vann
ne: पानी
nl: water, opgiet
nn: Vatn
no: vann, drikkevann
nv: Tó
oc: Aiga
om: Bishaan
or: ଜଳ
os: Дон
pa: ਪਾਣੀ
pl: Woda, wody, wodny, woda pitna
ps: اوبه
pt: Água
qu: Yaku
ro: Apă, apa
ru: Вода, вода питьевая, вода питьевая очищенная, очищенная вода, вода подготовленная, подготовленная вода, вода очищенная
sa: जलम्
sc: Aba
sd: پاڻي
se: Čáhci
sh: Voda
si: ජලය
sk: Voda
sl: Voda
sm: Vai
sn: Mvura
so: Biyo
sq: Uji
sr: Вода, voda
su: Cai
sv: vatten, bordsvatten
sw: Maji
ta: நீர்
te: నీరు
tg: Об
th: น้ำ
tk: Suw
tl: Tubig
tr: Su
ts: Mati
tt: Су
uk: Вода, вода́, вода питна
ur: پانی
uz: Suv
vi: Nước
vo: Vat
wo: Ndox
xh: Amanzi
yi: וואסער
yo: Omi
za: Raemx
zh: 水
zu: Amanzi

en: distilled water
ar: ماء مقطر
az: distillə olunmuş su
be: дыстыляваная вада
bg: дестилирана вода
ca: aigua destil·lada
cs: destilovaná voda
da: destilleret vand
de: destilliertes Wasser
el: απεσταγμένο νερό
eo: distilakvo
es: agua desmineralizada, agua destilada
et: destilleeritud vesi
eu: ur destilatu
fa: آب مقطر
fi: tislattu vesi
fr: eau distillée
gl: auga destilada
hi: आसुत जल
hr: destilirana voda
hu: desztillált víz
hy: թորած ջուր
id: air Suling
is: eimað vatn
it: acqua distillata
ja: 蒸留水
kk: бидистиллят
ko: 증류수
lv: destilēts ūdens
ms: air suling
nb: destillert vann, destillert vatn
nl: gedestilleerd water
nn: destillert vatn
pl: woda destylowana
pt: água destilada
ro: apă distilată
ru: дистиллированная вода
sk: destilovana voda
sl: destilirana voda
sr: дестилована вода
sv: destillerat vatten
ta: வாலைவடி நீர்
uk: дистильована вода
uz: distillangan suv
vi: nước cất
zh: 蒸馏水

en: water like ice wrap
de: Wasser als Schutzglasur
fr: eau comme glaçure d'enrobage
hr: voda poput ledenog omota
it: acqua come involucro di ghiaccio